Missouri, session 2026, HB2595.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 94, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 94.833, to read as follows:
94.833. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "City", a city of the third classification that operates under the city manager
form of government established under chapter 78;
(2) "Lodging establishment", a hotel, motel, bed and breakfast inn, or other
similar establishment offering similar lodging accommodations;
(3) "Lodging facility", a short-term rental of a house, condominium,
campground cabin, or other similar facility offering similar lodging accommodations;
(4) "Transient guests", individuals who, for thirty-one days or less during any
calendar quarter, occupy a room or rooms in a lodging establishment or occupy a
lodging facility.
2. (1) The governing body of a city may impose a tax on the charges for all
lodging establishment sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of lodging
establishments and on the charges for all lodging facilities paid by transient guests
who occupy such lodging facilities that are situated in the city or a portion thereof.
(2) Such tax shall:
(a) Not exceed five percent per occupied lodging establishment sleeping room
per night or five percent per rental term of such lodging facility;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2595 2
(b) Be in addition to the charge for the lodging establishment sleeping room or
lodging facility and shall be in addition to any and all other taxes; and
(c) Be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(3) The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city for the promotion of
tourism.
(4) Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the city, at any election available for the city, a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the city to impose the tax under this section.
3. (1) The question submitted for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form: "Shall ______ (insert city name) impose a tax on the
charges for all sleeping rooms and on the charges for all short-term rentals paid by the
transient guests of lodging establishments and lodging facilities situated in ______
(insert city name) at a rate of ______ (insert percentage) percent, the proceeds of which
shall be used solely for the promotion of tourism?".
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the tax shall become effective on the first day of the
second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question
is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. (1) On and after the effective date of any tax authorized in this section, the
city may adopt one of the two following provisions for the collection and administration
of the tax:
(a) The city may adopt rules and regulations for the internal collection of such
tax by the city officers usually responsible for collection and administration of city
taxes; or
(b) The city may enter into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state
of Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in this section.
(2) If a city adopts the internal collection of such tax under paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the city:
(a) Shall establish a fund for the deposit of all revenues derived from such tax,
from which the city may disburse moneys for the sole purpose of the promotion of
tourism through marketing, events, and constructing and maintaining tourism facilities;
and

HB 2595 3
(b) May collect a penalty of one percent and interest not to exceed two percent
per month on unpaid taxes that are deemed delinquent thirty days after the last day of
each quarter.
(3) If such city enters into an agreement under paragraph (b) of subdivision (1)
of this subsection, the director of revenue shall:
(a) Perform all functions incident to the administration, collection, enforcement,
and operation of such tax;
(b) Promulgate rules and regulations prescribing the forms and procedures
under which the tax authorized in this section shall be collected and reported;
(c) Collect the tax authorized in this section; and
(d) Retain an amount not to exceed one percent for cost of collection.
5. (1) After the initial bonds, if any, have been satisfied, the governing body of
such city may submit to the voters of the city, at any election available for the city, a
proposal to repeal the tax imposed under this section.
(2) The question submitted for such repeal shall be in substantially the following
form: "Shall ______ (insert city name) repeal the tax imposed on the charges for all
sleeping rooms and on the charges for all short-term rentals paid by the transient guests
of lodging establishments and lodging facilities situated in ______ (insert city name) at a
rate of ______ (insert percentage) percent for the promotion of tourism?".
(3) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the repeal shall become effective on December
thirty-first of the calendar year in which such appeal was approved. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, the repeal shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this subsection to the qualified voters and such question is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
✔